apertium-tr-tt.tr.lexc
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                             T U R K I S H                               !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

Multichar_Symbols

%<n%>         ! Noun
%<v%>         ! Verb
%<prn%>       ! Pronoun
%<num%>       ! Numeral
%<adv%>       ! Adverb multichar
%<adj%>       ! Adjective
%<det%>       ! Determiner
%<np%>        ! Proper noun
%<ij%>        ! Interjection
%<post%>      ! Postposition
%<abbr%>      ! Abbreviation
%<cnjcoo%>    ! Co-ordinating conjunction
%<cnjsub%>    ! Sub-ordinating conjunction (basically 'ki')
%<cnjadv%>    ! Adverbial conjunction

%<pred%>      ! Predicate
%<subst%>     ! Substantive

%<pers%>      ! Personal
%<ord%>       ! Ordinal
%<dem%>       ! Demonstrative
%<ind%>       ! Indefinite
%<itg%>       ! Interrogative
%<qnt%>       ! Quantifier
%<ref%>       ! Reflexive
%<neg%>       ! Negative
%<cop%>       ! Copula
%<rel%>       ! Relative

%<top%>       ! Toponym
%<al%>        ! Others (altres)
%<ant%>       ! Anthroponym
%<acr%>       ! Acronym
%<cog%>       ! Surname (cognomen)

%<m%>         ! Masculine
%<f%>         ! Feminine
%<mf%>        ! Masculine / feminine

%<p1%>        ! First person
%<p2%>        ! Second person
%<p3%>        ! Third person

%<sg%>        ! Singular
%<pl%>        ! Plural

%<nom%>       ! Nominative (unmarked)
%<loc%>       ! Locative
%<gen%>       ! Genitive
%<acc%>       ! Accusative 
%<dat%>       ! Dative
%<abl%>       ! Ablative
%<ins%>       ! Instrumental

%<attr%>      ! Attributive: -{k}{I}
%<locattr%>   ! Locative attributive: -{D}{A}{k}{I}

%<px1sg%>     ! First person singular possessive
%<px2sg%>     ! Second person singular possessive
%<px3sg%>     ! Third person singular possessive
%<px1pl%>     ! First person plural possessive
%<px2pl%>     ! Second person plural possessive
%<px3pl%>     ! Third person plural possessive

%<iv%>        ! Intransitive
%<tv%>        ! Transitive
%<pass%>      ! Passive
%<caus%>      ! Causative
%<abil%>      ! Abilitative

%<prc1%>      ! Participle #1: -{bY}{I}p

%<gna1%>      ! Verbal adverb #1: -{bY}{I}p

%<ger1%>      ! Gerund #1: -m{A}
%<ger2%>      ! Gerund #2: -m{A}{K}
%<ger3%>      ! Gerund #3: -{D}{I}{k}
%<ger4%>      ! Gerund #4: -{bY}{I}ş
%<ger5%>      ! Gerund #5: -{bY}{A}n
%<ger6%>      ! Gerund #6: -{bY}{A}r{A}k
%<ger8%>      ! (Future) gerund #8: -{bY}{A}c{A}{k}
%<impp%>      ! Imperfect participle #1: -{bY}{A}r{A}{k}

%<cont%>      ! Present continuous: -{bI}yor
%<opt%>       ! Optative: -{bY}{A}
%<past%>       ! Past: -{D}{I}
%<evid%>      ! Evidential past: -m{I}ş
%<imp%>       ! Imperative: -ø
%<fut%>       ! Future: -{bY}{A}c{A}{k}
%<cond%>      ! Conditional: -s{A}
%<pii%>       ! Imperfect: -m{A}kt{A}
%<oblig%>     ! Obligative: -m{A}l{I}
%<aor%>       ! Aorist: -{A}r or -{bI}r
%<pih%>       ! Habitual: Aorist + -{D}{I}

%<qst%>       ! Question particle

%<sent%>      ! Sentence marker
%<guio%>      ! Hyphen
%<cm%>        ! Comma
%<apos%>      ! Apostrophe
%<rquot%>     ! Quote marker (right hand side) 
%<lquot%>     ! Quote marker (left hand side) 
%<rpar%>      ! Parenthetical marker (right hand side) 
%<lpar%>      ! Parenthetical marker (left hand side) 


%{e%}         ! e or ''
%{a%}         ! a or ''
%{A%}         ! Archivowel {A}: e (a)
%{I%}         ! Archivowel {I}: u ü i (ı)
%{bN%}        ! Buffer 'n': -n- or -ø-
%{bY%}        ! Buffer 'y': -y- or -ø-
%{bI%}        ! Buffer 'i': -i- or -ø-
%{bS%}        ! Buffer 's': -s- or -ø-
%{D%}         ! Archicons {D}: d t
%{K%}         ! Archicons {K}: k ğ y
%{p%}         ! Archicons {p}: p b 
%{k%}         ! Archicons {k}: k ğ g
%{t%}         ! Archicons {t}: t d
%{c%}         ! Archicons {c}: c ç 
%{LN%}        ! Archicons {LN}: l n
%{compn%}     ! Do not allow possessives
%{dup%}       ! 
%{del%}       ! 
%{dels%}      ! 
%{pA%}        ! Unharmonised 'a'
%{pU%}        ! Unharmonised 'u'
%{pO%}        ! Unharmonised 'o'

%{nin%}
%{nın%}
%{nun%}
%{un%}
%{in%}

%>            ! Morpheme boundary
% 

LEXICON Root
Nouns ; 
Numerals ; 
Adjectives ; 
Adverbs ; 
Postpositions ; 
Conjunctions ; 
Pronouns ;
Determiners ;
ProperNouns ;
Acronyms ;
Punctuation ;
Interjections ;
Verbs ;
Particles ; 

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                       M O R P H O T A C T I C S                         !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

!! Case morphology

LEXICON clit

!%+mi%<qst%>:% m%{I%}%{bS%} poss-end ;
%+mi%<qst%>:% m%{I%} V-PERS-COP-G2-NOSG3 ;
%+mi%<qst%>:% m%{I%} # ;
# ;

LEXICON clit-cop

%+%i%<cop%>:% i V-PERS-COP-G2-NOSG3 ;  ! Dir/LR
%+%i%<cop%>%<past%>:% i%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-G1 ;  ! Dir/LR
%+%i%<cop%>%<cond%>:% i%>s%{A%} V-PERS-G1 ;  ! Dir/LR
%+%i%<cop%>%<evid%>:% i%>%{bY%}m%{I%}ş V-PERS-COP-G2 ;  ! Dir/LR
%+%i%<cop%>%<rel%>:% i%>ken #  ; ! Dir/LR
%+%i%<cop%>: V-PERS-COP-G2-NOSG3 ;
%+%i%<cop%>%<past%>:%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-G1 ;  
%+%i%<cop%>%<cond%>:%>%{bY%}s%{A%} V-PERS-G1 ;
%+%i%<cop%>%<evid%>:%>%{bY%}m%{I%}ş V-PERS-COP-G2 ;
%+%i%<cop%>%<rel%>:%>ken #  ;
clit ; 
!# ;

LEXICON DAKI

%<attr%>: # ;
%<subst%>: clit-cop ; 

LEXICON case1                     
%<loc%>:%>%{D%}%{A%} clit-cop ;
%<gen%>:%>%{bN%}%{I%}n clit-cop ;
%<loc%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}%{K%}i DAKI ; 

LEXICON case2                    
%<acc%>:%>%{bY%}%{I%} clit-cop ;
%<abl%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}n clit-cop ;
%<dat%>:%>%{bY%}%{A%} clit-cop ;
%<ins%>:%>%{bY%}l%{A%} clit-cop ;
!%<ins%>:%>%{bY%}l%{A%}n # ;

LEXICON case1p3
%<loc%>:%>%{bN%}d%{A%} clit-cop ;
%<gen%>:%>%{bN%}%{I%}n clit-cop ;
%<loc%>:%>%{bN%}%{D%}%{A%}%{K%}i DAKI ;

LEXICON case2p3
%<acc%>:%>%{bN%}%{I%} clit-cop ;
%<abl%>:%>%{bN%}d%{A%}n clit-cop ;
%<dat%>:%>%{bN%}%{A%} clit-cop ;
%<ins%>:%>%{bY%}l%{A%} clit-cop ;
!%<ins%>:%>%{bY%}l%{A%}n # ;

!! Possessive morphology

LEXICON poss-end

%<px1sg%>:%>%{bI%}m # ;
%<px2sg%>:%>%{bI%}n # ;
%<px1pl%>:%>%{bI%}m%{I%}z # ;
%<px2pl%>:%>%{bI%}n%{I%}z # ;
%<px3sg%>:%>%{bS%}%{I%} # ;
%<px3pl%>:%>l%{A%}r%{I%} # ;

LEXICON poss12-2                    
%<px1sg%>:%>%{bI%}m # ;
%<px2sg%>:%>%{bI%}n # ;
%<px1pl%>:%>%{bI%}m%{I%}z # ;
%<px2pl%>:%>%{bI%}n%{I%}z # ;

%<px1sg%>:%>%{bI%}m case2 ;
%<px2sg%>:%>%{bI%}n case2 ;
%<px1pl%>:%>%{bI%}m%{I%}z case2 ;
%<px2pl%>:%>%{bI%}n%{I%}z case2 ;


LEXICON poss12-1
%<px1sg%>:%>%{bI%}m # ;
%<px2sg%>:%>%{bI%}n # ;
%<px1pl%>:%>%{bI%}m%{I%}z # ;
%<px2pl%>:%>%{bI%}n%{I%}z # ;


%<px1sg%>:%>%{bI%}m case1 ;
%<px2sg%>:%>%{bI%}n case1 ;
%<px1pl%>:%>%{bI%}m%{I%}z case1 ;
%<px2pl%>:%>%{bI%}n%{I%}z case1 ;

LEXICON poss3-2

%<px3sg%>:%>%{bS%}%{I%} # ;
%<px3pl%>:%>l%{A%}r%{I%} # ;


%<px3sg%>:%>%{bS%}%{I%} case2p3 ;
%<px3pl%>:%>l%{A%}r%{I%} case2p3 ;

LEXICON poss3-1

%<px3sg%>:%>%{bS%}%{I%} # ;
%<px3pl%>:%>l%{A%}r%{I%} # ;


%<px3sg%>:%>%{bS%}%{I%} case1p3 ;
%<px3pl%>:%>l%{A%}r%{I%} case1p3 ;

LEXICON poss

poss12-1  ;
poss12-2  ;
poss3-1 ;
poss3-2 ;

!! Combinatorial morphology

LEXICON POSS12

poss12-1 ;
poss12-2 ;
%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r poss12-1 ;
%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r poss12-2 ;

LEXICON POSS3

poss3-1 ;
poss3-2 ;
%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r poss3-1 ;
%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r poss3-2 ;

LEXICON POSS

POSS12 ;
POSS3 ; 

LEXICON CASE1

case1 ;
%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r case1 ;
poss12-1 ; 
poss3-1;

LEXICON CASE2

case2 ;
%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r case2 ;
poss12-2 ;
poss3-2; 

LEXICON CASE-ONLY

case1 ; 
case2 ;

LEXICON CASE 

CASE1 ; 
CASE2 ; 

LEXICON NINFL-COMMON

POSS ;
CASE1 ; 
CASE2 ; 

LEXICON CASE-DEM 

case1 ; 
case2 ; 



LEXICON SUBST

: # ; 
: clit-cop ; 
%<attr%>: clit-cop ;  ! This is the attributive adjective use of -kI, TRmorph <ki>
!%<n%>%<attr%>:%>k%{I%} # ;  ! This is the attributive adjective use of -kI, TRmorph <ki>
!%<n%>%<attr%>:%>k%{I%} NINFL-COMMON ; ! This is the attribute adjective 0 derived into a noun, TRmorph <ki>
%<loc%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}%{k%}i DAKI ; ! This makes an attributive phrase from a noun, TRmorph <loc><ki>
%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r clit ; 
: NINFL-COMMON  ; 

LEXICON Verbs
var%<pred%>:var clit-cop ;
yok%<pred%>:yok clit-cop ;
değil%<pred%>:değil clit-cop ;
